Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 5. Fuel Taxes

§ 31-18-501.
Compliance with tax provisions.

All operators of commercial vehicles shall comply with the provisions of W.S.

39-17-101

through

39-17-211

.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 1; 1998, ch. 5, § 2.

§ 31-18-502.
Decal fee; disposition.

An additional fee may be collected by the issuing agency from a licensee for each annual decal issued pursuant to W.S. 39-17-202(d) through (g). The fee shall be in an amount determined by the department of transportation to be sufficient to recover reasonable administrative costs of the International Fuel Tax Agreement and the Multistate Highway Transportation Agreement, but not more than ten dollars ($10.00) per annual decal. The fee shall be remitted to the state treasurer who shall credit the multistate highway and fuel tax agreements account created by W.S. 39-17-211(e) within the highway fund.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 1; 1998, ch. 5, § 2; 2000, ch. 48, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2011, ch. 176, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “highway fund” for “highway trust fund.”

The 2011 amendment,

substituted “through (g)” for “through (j).”

Laws 2011, ch. 176 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”